Rhode Island statutes. Title 38 Public Records
Chapter 3 Public Records Administration

38-3-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Public Records Administration Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 353, § 6.

38-3-2.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Agency” or “public body” shall mean any executive, legislative, judicial, regulatory, administrative body of the state, or any political subdivision thereof; including, but not limited to, any department, division, agency, commission, board, office, bureau, authority, any school, fire, or water district, or other agency or quasi-public agency of state or local government which exercises governmental functions, or any other public or private agency, person, partnership, corporation, or business entity acting on behalf of any public agency.

“Program” shall mean the public records administration program of the secretary of state.

“Public record” or “public records” shall mean all documents, papers, letters, maps, books, tapes, photographs, films, sound recordings, or other material regardless of physical form or characteristics made or received pursuant to law or ordinance or in connection with the transaction of official business by any agency.

“Public records repository” shall mean the establishment maintained by the program for preservation of those public records determined by the program to have permanent value warranting their continued preservation and which has been accepted by the program for transfer to its custody.

“Records center” shall mean an establishment maintained by the program for the storage, processing, servicing, and security of public records that must be retained for varying periods of time but need not be retained in an agency’s office equipment or space.

“Records control schedule” shall mean the document establishing the official retention, maintenance, and disposal requirements for a series or type of record based on administrative, legal, fiscal, and historical values for the scheduled records.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 353, § 6; P.L. 1991, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 42; P.L. 2012, ch. 451, § 2.

38-3-3.
Public records administration program.

The public records administration program shall be organized as deemed necessary by the secretary of state for the proper discharge of its duties and responsibilities under this chapter. All personnel, furnishings, equipment, finances, property, and contractual arrangements of the public records administration shall be the responsibility of the secretary of state.

There shall be a public records advisory commission consisting of seventeen (17) members, one of whom shall be a member of the senate chosen by the president of the senate, one of whom shall be a member of the house of representatives chosen by the speaker of the house, six (6) of whom shall be chosen by the governor, and seven (7) of whom shall be chosen by the secretary of state. The secretary of state or designee shall serve as a permanent member of the commission. The state archivist shall serve as a permanent member of the commission. The appointments shall consist of persons who are qualified by training and experience with proven interest in historical records and public records management. In the first instance, five (5) members shall be appointed for a one year term, two (2) by the governor and three (3) by the secretary of state; five (5) members shall be appointed for a two (2) year term, one by the speaker of the house, one by the president of the senate, two (2) by the governor, and one by the secretary of state; five (5) members shall be appointed for a three (3) year term, two (2) by the governor, and three (3) by the secretary of state. The members shall hold office until July 1, in the years in which their respective terms end. Thereafter, prior to July 1, successors shall be appointed to the commission to the members of the commission whose terms expired. Vacancy of a member shall be filled by appointment by the corresponding authority for the remainder of the unexpired terms.

The secretary of state or designee shall serve as the chairperson of the commission. The state archivist or designee shall serve as the secretary of the commission with voting rights.

It shall be the duty of the public records advisory commission to provide professional and technical assistance to the public records administration program, the state archives, and the local governments of the state in all matters relating to the administration of public records. Members of the commission shall serve without pay.

The secretary of state may appoint an administrator of the program and shall establish his or her qualifications other than the professional competence required. The administrator shall coordinate, direct, and administer the activities and responsibilities of the program. The administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary of state.

The program may make and enter into contracts and agreements with other agencies, organizations, associations, corporations, and individuals, or federal agencies as it may determine are necessary, expedient, or incidental to the performance of its duties or the execution of its powers under this chapter.

The program shall adopt rules and regulations deemed necessary to carry out its duties and responsibilities under this chapter which rules shall be binding on all agencies and persons affected thereby. The willful violation of any of the rules and regulations adopted by the program shall constitute a misdemeanor.

The program may accept gifts, grants, bequests, loans, and endowments for purposes not inconsistent with its responsibilities under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 353, § 6; P.L. 1991, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 80; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 42.

38-3-4.
Duties of administrator.

It shall be the duty and responsibility of the administrator to render all services required by the program herein set forth that can advantageously and effectively be centralized. The office shall perform such other functions and duties as the secretary of state may direct.

The administrator shall supervise, direct, and coordinate the activities of the program.

The administrator shall be designated “the public records administrator”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 353, § 6; P.L. 1991, ch. 179, § 1.

38-3-5.
Duties of program.

It shall be the duty and responsibility of the public records administration program to:

Establish and administer a public records management program, including the operation of a record center or centers, and appoint a director who will apply efficient and economical management methods relating to the creation, utilization, maintenance, retention, preservation, and disposal of records.

Analyze, develop, establish, and coordinate standards, procedures, and techniques of record making and record keeping.

Insure the maintenance and security of records which are deemed appropriate for preservation.

Institute and maintain a training and information program in all phases of records management to bring to the attention of all agencies approved and current practices, methods, procedures, and devices for the efficient and economical management of records.

Make available a centralized program of microfilming for the benefit of all agencies.

Make continuous surveys of record keeping operations.

Recommend improvements in current records management practices, including the use of space, equipment, supplies, and personnel in creating, maintaining, and servicing records.

Establish and maintain a program, in cooperation with each agency, for the selection and protection of public records considered essential to the operation of government and to the protection of the rights and privileges of citizens.

Make or to have made duplicates of essential records, or to designate existing record copies as essential records to be protected in the place and manner of safekeeping as prescribed by the program.

The duplicate of any record made pursuant to this chapter shall have the same force and effect for all purposes as the original record. A transcript, exemplification, or certified copy of the duplicate shall be deemed, for all purposes, to be the original record.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 353, § 6; P.L. 1990, ch. 492, § 10.

38-3-5.1.
Reproduction of public records — Destruction of original records.

If any department or agency of government, in the regular course of business or activity, has kept or recorded any memorandum, writing, state tax returns, report, application, payment, entry, print, representation, or combination thereof, or any act, transaction, occurrence, or event, and, in the regular course of business, has caused any or all of the records to be recorded, copied, or reproduced by a photographic, photostatic, microfilm, micro-card, optical disk, miniature photographic, or other process which accurately reproduces or forms a durable medium for reproducing the original, the original may be destroyed in the regular course of business, provided the process meets standards established by the public records administration, and provided all the provisions of §

38-3-6

concerning disposal of public records are fulfilled. The reproduction, when satisfactorily identified, shall be admissible in evidence as the original in any judicial or administrative proceeding whether or not the original exists or is available and an enlargement or facsimile of the reproduction shall be likewise admissible in evidence if the original is in existence and available for inspection under the direction of the court. The introduction of a reproduced record, enlargement, or facsimile into evidence shall not preclude the admission into evidence of the original. This section shall not be construed to exclude from introduction into evidence any document or copy thereof which is otherwise admissible under the Rhode Island general laws, as amended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 577, § 1.

38-3-6.
Public records custody and disposal.

Each agency shall prepare and submit to the program, in accordance with the rules and regulations of the program, record control schedules for all public records in the custody of the agency.

The offices of the attorney general and the auditor general will advise the program on the legal and fiscal values of records covered by proposed records control schedules.

Those records which are determined by an agency not to be needed in the transaction of current business but which, for legal or fiscal requirements, must be retained for specific time periods beyond administrative needs, shall be sent to the records center. The records will be kept in the center until time for disposition as provided in record control schedules.

Public records possessing permanent value as determined by approved records control schedules shall be transferred to the public records repository when no longer needed by an agency in transaction of current business.

Title to any record placed in the records center shall remain in the agency placing the record in the center.

Title to any record transferred to the public records repository, as authorized in this chapter, shall be vested in the program.

The program shall preserve and administer such public records as shall be transferred to its custody according to approved conservation and security practices, and to permit them to be inspected, examined, and copied at reasonable times and under supervision of the program; provided that any record placed in keeping of the program under special terms or conditions restricting their use shall be made available only in accordance with the terms and conditions.

Provide a public research room where, upon policies established by the program, the records in the public records repository may be studied.

The program may make certified copies under seal of any records transferred to it upon the application of any person, and the certificates, signed by the administrator or his or her designee, shall have the same force and effect as if made by the agency from which the records were received. The program may charge a reasonable fee for this service.

No public record shall be destroyed or otherwise disposed of by any agency without prior notice to the program.

The program shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter relating to the destruction and disposal of records. The rules and regulations shall provide but not be limited to:

Procedures for preparing and submitting record control schedules to the program.

Procedures for the physical destruction or other disposal of records.

Standards for the reproduction of records for security or with a view to the disposal of the original record.

The program shall:

Establish safeguards against unauthorized or unlawful removal or loss of records; and

Initiate appropriate action to recover records removed unlawfully or without authorization.

The program may prepare and publish handbooks, guides, indexes, and other literature directed toward encouraging the management, preservation, and uses of the state’s public records resource.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 353, § 6.

38-3-7.
Agency responsibilities.

It shall be the duty of each agency to:

Cooperate with the program in complying with the provisions of this chapter.

Establish and maintain an active and continuous program for the economical and efficient management of public records.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 353, § 6.